Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-329
Abortion; when not to be performed.

No abortion shall be performed after the time at which, in the sound medical judgment of the attending physician, the unborn child clearly appears to have reached viability, except when necessary to preserve the life or health of the mother.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 44;

Laws 1979, LB 316, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 695, § 4.